Maryland, session 2025, HB0247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–105.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to an individual who:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0247*

HOUSE BILL 247
(i) Seeks to obtain an original driver’s license under this subtitle;
and
(ii) Does not qualify for a learner’s instructional permit under
subsection (e) of this section.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, an individual
under the age of 19 years who holds a learner’s instructional permit may not take a driver
skills examination or driver road examination for a provisional license:
(i) Sooner than 9 months following the later of:
1. The date that the individual first obtains the learner’s
instructional permit; or
2. The most recent date the individual was convicted of, or
granted probation before judgment under § 6–220 of the Criminal Procedure Article for, a
moving violation;
(ii) Until after successful completion of:
1. The driver education program approved under Subtitle 5
of this title, consisting of at least 30 hours of classroom instruction and at least 6 hours of
highway driving instruction; and
2. At least 60 hours, 10 hours of which must occur during the
period beginning 30 minutes before sunset and ending 30 minutes after sunrise, of
behind–the–wheel driving practice supervised by an individual who:
A. Holds a valid driver’s license;
B. Is at least 21 years old; and
C. Has been licensed to drive for at least 3 years; and
(iii) Unless the individual submits, in accordance with the
Administration’s regulations, a completed skills log book signed by:
1. Each supervising driver who certifies that the individual
has satisfactorily demonstrated a required skill and has completed the driving practice
requirements of item (ii)2 of this paragraph; and
2. If a signature of a parent, guardian, or other person is
required under § 16–107 of this subtitle, the parent, guardian, or other person who signs
the individual’s application under that section.

HOUSE BILL 247 3
(3) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “UNACCOMPANIED HOMELESS
YOUTH” MEANS A CHILD OR YOUTH WHO:
1. IS NOT IN THE PHYSICAL CUSTODY OF A PARENT OR
GUARDIAN;
2. IS A HOMELESS CHILD OR YOUTH, AS DEFINED BY THE
MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT; AND
3. WAS DETERMINED TO BE A HOMELESS CHILD OR
YOUTH BY:
A. A MARYLAND LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM HOMELESS
LIAISON, AS DEFINED BY THE MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT;
B. A DIRECTOR OR A DESIGNEE OF THE DIRECTOR OF A
MARYLAND–BASED PROGRAM FUNDED UNDER THE RUNAWAY AND HOMELESS
YOUTH ACT; OR
C. A DIRECTOR OR A DESIGNEE OF THE DIRECTOR OF A
MARYLAND–BASED PROGRAM FUNDED UNDER TITLE IV, SUBTITLE B OF THE
MCKINNEY–VENTO HOMELESS ASSISTANCE ACT.
(II) An individual who holds a learner’s instructional permit and who
is 18 years old and has a high school diploma or its [equivalent or] EQUIVALENT, is at least
19 years old but under the age of 25 years, OR IS AN UNACCOMPANIED HOMELESS
YOUTH WHO HOLDS A LEARNER’S INSTRUCTIONAL PERMIT AND IS UNDER THE AGE
OF 19 YEARS, may not take a driver skills examination or driver road examination for a
provisional license:
[(i)] 1. Sooner than the later of:
[1.] A. 3 months following the date that the individual first
obtains the learner’s instructional permit; or
[2.] B. 9 months following the most recent date the
individual was convicted of, or granted probation before judgment for, a moving violation;
[(ii)] 2. Until after successful completion of:
[1.] A. A standard driver education program approved
under Subtitle 5 of this title, consisting of at least 30 hours of classroom instruction and at
least 6 hours of highway driving instruction; and

HOUSE BILL 247
[2.] B. At least 60 hours, 10 hours of which must occur
during the period beginning 30 minutes before sunset and ending 30 minutes after sunrise,
of behind–the–wheel driving practice supervised by an individual who:
[A.] I. Holds a valid driver’s license;
[B.] II. Is at least 21 years old; and
[C.] III. Has been licensed to drive for at least 3 years; and
[(iii)] 3. Unless the individual submits, in accordance with the
Administration’s regulations, a completed skills log book signed by each supervising driver
who certifies that the individual has satisfactorily demonstrated a required skill and has
completed the driving practice requirements under this paragraph.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.